apertium-tel.tel.twol
! Telugu TWOLC file

Alphabet

  క  ఖ  గ  ఘ  ఙ  చ  ఛ  జ  ఝ  ఞ   ట  ఠ  డ  ఢ  ణ  త  థ  ద  ధ  న 
  ప  ఫ  బ  భ  మ  య  ర  ల  వ  ళ  శ  ష  స  హ  ఱ 

  అ  ఆ   ఇ  ఈ  ఉ  ఊ  ఋ  ౠ  ఌ  ౡ  ఎ  ఏ  ఐ  ఒ  ఓ  ఔ  అం  అః 

్  ు  ి 

  %{u%}:్ 
  %>:0  ;

Sets

Achiphonemes = %{u%} ; 

Cns =   క  ఖ  గ  ఘ  ఙ  చ  ఛ  జ  ఝ  ఞ   ట  ఠ  డ  ఢ  ణ  త  థ  ద  ధ  న 
  ప  ఫ  బ  భ  మ  య  ర  ల  వ  ళ  శ  ష  స  హ  ఱ  ; 

Vow =   అ  ఆ   ఇ  ఈ  ఉ  ఊ  ఋ  ౠ  ఌ  ౡ  ఎ  ఏ  ఐ  ఒ  ఓ  ఔ  అం  అః  ;

Rules

"{u} appears word final"
%{u%}:ు <=> _ .#. ;

"TT DD shortening in Plural"
Cx:0 <=> Cx ్:  _ %{u%}: %>: ల ; 
    where Cx in ( ట డ ) ;
 ! Teststring:
 ! ట ్ట%{u%}%>ల
    
"Double Halant Deletion"
%{u%}:0 <=>  ్:  ట:0  _   ;  !  Trying to delete the second halant
 ! ్:0 <=> _ ట:0    %{u%}: ;  !  Trying to delete the first halant

 ! Teststring:
 !    ్ట%{u%}%>ల
